Utah statutes.
17-36-4.   State auditor -- Advisory committee -- Duties.
(1)  The state auditor, with the assistance, advice, and recommendation of the
advisory committee, shall:
(a)  prescribe a uniform system of fiscal procedures for the several counties;
(b)  conduct a constant review and modification of such procedures to improve
them;
(c)  prepare and supply each county budget officer with suitable budget forms;
and
(d)  prepare instructional materials, conduct training programs, and render
other services deemed necessary to assist counties in implementing the uniform
system.
(2)  The uniform system of procedure may include reasonable exceptions and
modifications applicable to counties with a population of 25,000 or less, such
population to be determined by the Utah Population Work Committee. Counties
may expand the uniform system to serve better their needs. Deviations from or
alterations to the basic prescribed classification system for the identity of
funds and accounts should not be made.
